California statutes. Education Code
(a) For purposes of this section, “charged with a mandatory leave of absence offense” is defined to mean charged by complaint, information, or indictment filed in a court of competent jurisdiction with the commission of any sex offense as defined in Section 44010, with a violation or attempted violation of Section 187 of the Penal Code, or with the commission of any offense involving aiding or abetting the unlawful sale, use, or exchange to minors of controlled substances listed in Schedule I, II, or III, as contained in Sections 11054, 11055, and 11056 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) For purposes of this section, “charged with an optional leave of absence offense” is defined to mean a charge by complaint, information,
 or indictment filed in a court of competent jurisdiction with the commission of any controlled substance offense as defined in Section 44011 or 87011 of this code, or Sections 11357 to 11361, inclusive, or Section 11363, 11364, or 11370.1 of the Health and Safety Code, insofar as these sections relate to any controlled substances except marijuana, mescaline, peyote, or tetrahydrocannabinols.

(c) For purposes of this section and Section 44940.5, the term “school district” includes county offices of education.

(d) (1) If a certificated employee of a school district is charged with a mandatory leave of absence offense, as defined in subdivision (a), upon being informed that a charge has been filed, the governing board of the school district shall immediately place the employee on compulsory leave of absence. The duration of the leave of absence shall be until a
 time not more than 10 days after the date of entry of the judgment in the proceedings. No later than 10 days after receipt of the complaint, information, or indictment described by subdivision (a), the school district shall forward a copy to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(2) Upon receiving a copy of a complaint, information, or indictment described in subdivision (a) and forwarded by a school district, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall automatically suspend the employee’s teaching or service credential. The duration of the suspension shall be until a time not more than 10 days after the date of entry of the judgment in the proceedings.

(e) (1) If a certificated employee of a school district is charged with an optional leave of absence offense as defined in subdivision (b), the governing board of the school district may immediately place
 the employee upon compulsory leave in accordance with the procedure in this section and Section 44940.5. If any certificated employee is charged with an offense deemed to fall into both the mandatory and the optional leave of absence categories, as defined in subdivisions (a) and (b), that offense shall be treated as a mandatory leave of absence offense for purposes of this section. No later than 10 days after receipt of the complaint, information, or indictment described by subdivision (a), the school district shall forward a copy to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing.

(2) Upon receiving a copy of a complaint, information, or indictment described in subdivision (a) and forwarded by a school district, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall automatically suspend the employee’s teaching or service credential. The duration of the suspension shall be until a time not more than 10 days after the date of entry of the judgment in the
 proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 88.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44940.5.

A certificated employee placed on compulsory leave of absence pursuant to Section 44940, and a classified employee placed on compulsory leave of absence pursuant to Section 45304 shall be subject to the following procedures:

(a) The governing board of the school district may extend the compulsory leave of absence of the employee beyond the initial period specified in Section 44940 or 45304, whichever is applicable, by giving notice to the employee within 10 days after the entry of judgment in the proceedings that the employee will be dismissed at the expiration of 30 days from the date of service of the notice, unless the employee demands a hearing as provided in this article.

(b) An employee placed upon compulsory leave of absence pursuant to this section shall continue to be paid his or her regular salary during the period of his or her compulsory leave of absence if and during that time he or she furnishes to the school district a suitable bond, or other security acceptable to the governing board, as a guarantee that the employee will repay to the school district the amount of salary so paid to him or her during the period of the compulsory leave of absence in case the employee is convicted of the charges, or fails or refuses to return to service following an acquittal of the offense or dismissal of the charges. If the employee is acquitted of the offense, or the charges against the employee are dismissed, the school district shall reimburse the employee for the cost of the bond upon his or her return to service in the school district.

(c) If the employee does not elect to furnish bond, or other security acceptable to the governing board of the district, and if the employee is acquitted of the offense, or the charges against him or her are dismissed without his or her guilt being established, the school district shall pay to the employee his or her full compensation for the period of the compulsory leave of absence upon his or her return to service in the school district. If the charges against the employee are dismissed as a result of the employee’s successful completion of a drug diversion program, upon the employee’s return to service in the school district, the school district, at the employee’s election, shall pay to the employee any accrued leave, and differential pay pursuant to Sections 44977, 45195, and 45196, for up to the length of the employee’s compulsory leave of absence.

(d) An action taken pursuant to this section by a governing board shall be reported immediately to the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The commission shall give priority to the investigation and resolution of these cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 579, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44941.

(a) The notice of suspension and intention to dismiss shall be in writing and served pursuant to Section 44936. A copy of the charges filed, containing the information required by Section 11503 of the Government Code, together with a copy of the provisions of this article, shall be attached to the notice. If the employee does not demand a hearing within the 30-day period, he or she may be dismissed upon the expiration of 30 days after service of the notice.

(b) An employee who demands a hearing shall file a single document containing his or her request for a hearing pursuant to this section and a notice of defense pursuant to Sections 11505 and 11506 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 12.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44941.1.

Notwithstanding Section 44941, the notice of suspension and intention to dismiss that is based exclusively on charges of egregious misconduct as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 44932, shall be in writing and served pursuant to Section 44936. A copy of the charges filed, containing the information required by Section 11503 of the Government Code, together with a copy of the provisions of this article, shall be attached to the notice. If the employee does not demand a hearing within the 30-day period, he or she may be dismissed upon the expiration of 30 days after service of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 13.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44942.

(a) Any certificated employee may be suspended or transferred to other duties by the governing board if the board has reasonable cause to believe that the employee is suffering from mental illness of such a degree as to render him or her incompetent to perform his or her duties.

(b) The governing board shall immediately, upon any suspension or transfer under this section, give to the employee a written statement of the facts giving rise to the board’s belief, and an opportunity to appear before the board within 10 days to explain or refute the charges.

(c) If, after the employee’s appearance before the board, the board decides to continue the suspension or transfer, or if the employee chooses not to appear before the board, the employee shall then be offered, in writing, the opportunity of being examined by a panel consisting of three persons who are either psychiatrists or psychologists, at least one of whom shall be a psychiatrist, selected by him or her from a list of psychiatrists and psychologists to be provided by the board. To assist the panel in making its determination, the governing board shall supply to the panel, prior to the date scheduled for the examination, a list of the duties of the position from which the employee was suspended or transferred. The employee shall continue to receive his or her regular salary and all other benefits of employment during the period dating from his or her suspension to the filing of the report of the panel with the governing board.

(d) The examination shall be conducted at school district expense within 15 days of any suspension or transfer ordered under this section. The employee shall submit to the examination, but shall be entitled to be represented by a psychiatrist, psychologist licensed under Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 2900) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or physician of his or her own choice, and any report of the psychiatrist, psychologist, or physician selected by him or her shall be filed with the panel at the request of the employee.

A written report of the panel on the examination of the suspended or transferred employee shall be submitted to the governing board no later than 10 days after completion of the examination. A copy shall be supplied to the employee upon request. The report shall contain a finding on whether the employee is suffering from mental illness of such a degree as to render him or her incompetent to perform his or her duties.

(e) If a majority of the panel conclude that the employee should be permitted to return to his or her duties, no written record of the suspension or of the determination of the panel shall be retained, and in all respects any written record concerning the employee shall appear as it did before the suspension was made.

(f) If a majority of the panel find in the panel’s report that the employee is suffering from mental illness of such a degree as to render him or her incompetent to perform his or her duties, the governing board may, upon receipt of the report, place the employee on mandatory sick leave of absence. Any mandatory sick leave of absence imposed under this section shall not exceed two years, during which period the employee shall be entitled to sick leave and hospital and medical benefits that he or she accrued during his or her employment by the governing board but only to the extent of that accrual.

(g) Any employee placed on mandatory sick leave of absence pursuant to this section may, in writing, immediately demand a hearing. Upon receipt of that written demand, the governing board shall file a complaint in the superior court of the county in which the school district, or the major part thereof, is located, setting forth the charges against the employee and asking that the court inquire into the charges and determine whether or not the charges are true, and, if true, whether they constitute sufficient grounds for placing the employee on mandatory sick leave of absence, and for a judgment pursuant to its findings.

(h) If the court finds that the employee was not, at the time of the suspension, incompetent to perform his or her assigned duties and should not have been placed on mandatory sick leave of absence, the employee shall be immediately reinstated to the same or a substantially similar position with full back salary, and any written record of the suspension or transfer or any report of the panel shall be destroyed.

(i) If the court confirms the placing of the employee on mandatory sick leave, or if the employee does not seek a hearing, then, upon written request of the employee made not earlier than six months nor later than two years after the date he or she was placed on mandatory sick leave of absence, a new panel consisting of three persons who are either psychiatrists or psychologists, at least one of whom shall be a psychiatrist, shall be convened by, and at the expense of, the governing board to review its original conclusion. If the original conclusion is not changed by the new panel as a result of that review, the employee shall be continued on the mandatory sick leave of absence, except that when the employee’s total period of absence exceeds two years, the governing board shall either rescind its action and reinstate the employee to the same or a substantially similar position, or shall serve the employee with a notice of intention to dismiss him or her, and proceed according to Section 44943.

(j) If a majority of the new panel concludes in its report, or any subsequent review thereof, that the suspended employee or employee on mandatory sick leave of absence should be permitted to return to his or her duties, or if the court so concludes, the governing board shall take immediate action to restore the employee to the position from which he or she was suspended or transferred or to a substantially similar position.

(k) Every hearing and action by or before the governing board pursuant to this section shall be in executive session, and no decision, action, or occurrence therein shall be made public, unless the employee so requests in writing.

(l) Nothing in this section shall be construed to supersede Section 44949.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 455, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

44943.

When any employee who has been served with notice pursuant to Section 44934 or 44934.1 of the governing board’s intention to dismiss or suspend him or her demands a hearing, the governing board shall have the option either (a) to rescind its action, or (b) schedule a hearing on the matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 55, Sec. 14.   (AB 215)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

44944.

(a) This section applies only to dismissal or suspension proceedings initiated pursuant to Section 44934.

(b) (1) (A) In a dismissal or suspension proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934, if a hearing is requested by the employee, the hearing shall be commenced within six months from the date of the employee’s demand for a hearing. A continuance shall not extend the date for the commencement of the hearing more than six months from the date of the employee’s request for a hearing, except for extraordinary circumstances, as determined by the administrative law judge. If extraordinary circumstances are found that extend the date for the commencement of the hearing, the deadline for concluding the hearing and closing
 the record pursuant to this subdivision shall be extended for a period of time equal to the continuance. The hearing date shall be established after consultation with the employee and the governing board of the school district, or their representatives, except that if the parties are not able to reach an agreement on a date, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall unilaterally set a date in compliance with this section. The hearing shall be completed by a closing of the record within seven months of the date of the employee’s demand for a hearing. A continuance shall not extend the date for the close of the record more than seven months from the date of the employee’s request for a hearing, except for good cause, as determined by the administrative law judge.

(B) If substantial progress has been made in completing the previously scheduled days of the hearing within the seven-month period but the hearing cannot be completed, for good cause
 shown, within the seven-month period, the period for completing the hearing may be extended by the presiding administrative law judge. If the administrative law judge grants a continuance under this subparagraph, the administrative law judge shall establish a reasonable timetable for the completion of the hearing and the closing of the record. The hearing shall be initiated and conducted, and a decision made, in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the Commission on Professional Competence shall have all of the power granted to an agency pursuant to that chapter, except as described in this article.

(2) (A) A witness shall not be permitted to testify at the hearing except upon oath or affirmation. Testimony shall not be given or evidence shall not be introduced relating to matters that occurred more than four years before the date of the
 filing of the notice, except in one of the following circumstances:

(i) Testimony or evidence regarding allegations of behavior or communication of a sexual nature with a pupil that is beyond the scope or requirements of the educational program, which may constitute misconduct, or an act described in Section 212.5, but not amounting to conduct described in clause (ii), may be introduced in a disciplinary proceeding based on similar conduct, where such allegations have been substantiated through an investigation or proceeding, or for which the employee was subject to discipline or other form of penalty.

(ii) Testimony or evidence regarding allegations of an act described in Section 288 of the Penal Code with respect to a pupil of any age, Section 288.3 of the Penal Code, Section 44010 of this code, or Sections 11165.2 to 11165.6, inclusive, of the Penal Code may be introduced in
 any disciplinary proceeding.

(B) Evidence of records regularly kept by the governing board of the school district concerning the employee may be introduced, but no decision relating to the dismissal or suspension of an employee shall be made based on charges or evidence of any nature relating to matters occurring more than four years before the filing of the notice, except as allowed pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(c) (1) The hearing provided for in this section shall be conducted by a Commission on Professional Competence, unless the parties submit a statement in writing to the Office of Administrative Hearings, indicating that both parties waive the right to convene a Commission on Professional Competence and stipulate to having the hearing conducted by a single administrative law judge. If the parties elect to waive a hearing before the Commission on
 Professional Competence, the hearing shall be initiated and conducted, and a decision made, in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the administrative law judge conducting the hearing shall have all the powers granted to a Commission on Professional Competence pursuant to that chapter, except as described in this article.

(2) If the parties elect not to waive a hearing before a Commission on Professional Competence, one member of the commission shall be selected by the employee, one member shall be selected by the governing board of the school district, and one member shall be an administrative law judge of the Office of Administrative Hearings who shall be chairperson and a voting member of the commission and shall be responsible for assuring that the legal rights of the parties are protected at the hearing.

(3) The governing board of the school district and the employee shall select Commission on Professional Competence members no later than 45 days before the date set for hearing, and shall serve notice of their selection upon all other parties and upon the Office of Administrative Hearings. Failure to meet this deadline shall constitute a waiver of the right to selection, and the county board of education or its specific designee shall immediately make the selection. If the county board of education is also the governing board of the school district or has by statute been granted the powers of a governing board, the selection shall be made by the Superintendent, who shall be reimbursed by the school district for all costs incident to the selection.

(4) Any party who believes that a selected Commission on Professional Competence member is not qualified may file an objection, including a statement describing the basis for the
 objection, with the Office of Administrative Hearings and serve the objection and statement upon all other parties within 10 days of the date that the notice of selection is filed. Within seven days after the filing of any objection, the administrative law judge assigned to the matter shall rule on the objection or convene a teleconference with the parties for argument.

(5) (A) The member selected by the governing board of the school district and the member selected by the employee shall not be related to the employee and shall not be employees of the school district initiating the dismissal or suspension. Each member shall hold a currently valid credential and have at least three years’ experience within the past 10 years in the discipline of the employee.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the following terms have the following meanings:

(i) For an employee subject to dismissal whose most recent teaching assignment is in kindergarten or any of the grades 1 to 6, inclusive, “discipline” means a teaching assignment in kindergarten or any of the grades 1 to 6, inclusive.

(ii) For an employee subject to dismissal whose most recent assignment requires an education specialist credential or a services credential, “discipline” means an assignment that requires an education specialist credential or a services credential, respectively.

(iii) For an employee subject to dismissal whose most recent teaching assignment is in any of the grades 7 to 12, inclusive, “discipline” means a teaching assignment in any of grades 7 to 12, inclusive, in the same area of study, as that term is used in Section 51220, as the most recent teaching assignment of the employee subject
 to dismissal.

(d) (1) The decision of the Commission on Professional Competence shall be made by a majority vote, and the commission shall prepare a written decision containing findings of fact, determinations of issues, and a disposition that shall be, solely, one of the following:

(A) That the employee should be dismissed.

(B) That the employee should be suspended for a specific period of time without pay.

(C) That the employee should not be dismissed or suspended.

(2) The decision of the Commission on Professional Competence that the employee should not be dismissed or suspended shall not be based on nonsubstantive procedural errors committed by the school district
 or governing board of the school district unless the errors are prejudicial errors.

(3) The Commission on Professional Competence shall not have the power to dispose of the charge of dismissal by imposing probation or other alternative sanctions. The imposition of suspension pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) shall be available only in a suspension proceeding authorized pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 44932 or Section 44933.

(4) The decision of the Commission on Professional Competence shall be deemed to be the final decision of the governing board of the school district.

(5) The governing board of the school district may adopt from time to time rules and procedures not inconsistent with this section as may be necessary to effectuate this section.

(6) The governing board of the school district and the employee shall have the right to be represented by counsel.

(e) (1) If the member selected by the governing board of the school district or the member selected by the employee is employed by any school district in this state, the member shall, during any service on a Commission on Professional Competence, continue to receive salary, fringe benefits, accumulated sick leave, and other leaves and benefits from the school district in which the member is employed, but shall not receive additional compensation or honorariums for service on the commission.

(2) If the member selected is a retired employee, the member shall receive pay at the daily substitute teacher rate in the school district that is a party to the hearing. Service on a Commission on Professional Competence shall not be credited
 toward retirement benefits.

(3) If service on a Commission on Professional Competence occurs during summer recess or vacation periods, the member shall receive compensation proportionate to that received during the current or immediately preceding contract period from the member’s employing school district, whichever amount is greater.

(f) (1) If the Commission on Professional Competence determines that the employee should be dismissed or suspended, the governing board of the school district and the state shall share equally the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge. The state shall pay any costs incurred under paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (e), the reasonable expenses, as determined by the administrative law judge, of the member selected by the governing board of the school district and the member selected by the
 employee, including, but not limited to, payments or obligations incurred for travel, meals, and lodging, and the cost of the substitute or substitutes, if any, for the member selected by the governing board of the school district and the member selected by the employee. The Controller shall pay all claims submitted pursuant to this paragraph from the General Fund, and may prescribe reasonable rules, regulations, and forms for the submission of the claims. The employee and the governing board of the school district shall pay their own attorney’s fees.

(2) If the Commission on Professional Competence determines that the employee should not be dismissed or suspended, the governing board of the school district shall pay the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge, any costs incurred under paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (e), the reasonable expenses, as determined by the administrative law judge, of the
 member selected by the governing board of the school district and the member selected by the employee, including, but not limited to, payments or obligations incurred for travel, meals, and lodging, the cost of the substitute or substitutes, if any, for the member selected by the governing board of the school district and the member selected by the employee, and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the employee.

(3) As used in this section, “reasonable expenses” shall not be deemed “compensation” within the meaning of subdivision (e).

(4) If either the governing board of the school district or the employee petitions a court of competent jurisdiction for review of the decision of the Commission on Professional Competence, the payment of expenses to members of the commission required by this subdivision shall not be stayed.

(5) If the decision of the Commission on Professional Competence is reversed or vacated by a court of competent jurisdiction, either the state, having paid the commission members’ expenses, shall be entitled to reimbursement from the governing board of the school district for those expenses, or the governing board of the school district, having paid the expenses, shall be entitled to reimbursement from the state. If either the governing board of the school district or the employee petitions a court of competent jurisdiction for review of the decision to overturn the administrative law judge’s decision, the payment of the expenses of the hearing, including the cost of the administrative law judge required by this paragraph, shall be stayed until no further appeal is sought, or all appeals are exhausted.

(g) (1) The hearing provided for in this section shall be
 conducted in a place selected by agreement among the members of the Commission on Professional Competence. In the absence of agreement, the place shall be selected by the administrative law judge.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the parties may mutually agree to hold the hearing by telephone, videoconference, or other electronic means.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 401, Sec. 9.   (AB 1578)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44944.05.

(a) In a dismissal or suspension proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934, in lieu of written discovery required pursuant to Section 11507.6 of the Government Code, the parties shall make disclosures as described in this section. This section does not apply to dismissal or suspension proceedings initiated pursuant to Section 44934.1.

(b) (1) An initial disclosure shall comply with the following requirements:

(A) A party shall, without awaiting a discovery request, provide to the other parties both of the following:

(i) The name and, if known, the address and
 telephone number of each individual likely to have discoverable information, along with the subjects of information relating to the allegations made in the charges and the parties’ claims and defenses, unless the use would be solely for impeachment purposes.

(ii) A copy of all documents, electronically stored information, and tangible items that the disclosing party has in its possession, custody, or control relating to the allegations made in the charges and the parties’ claims or defenses, unless the use would be solely for impeachment.

(B) The school district and the employee shall make their initial disclosures within 45 days of the date of the employee’s demand for a hearing.

(C) A party shall make its initial disclosures based on the information then reasonably available to it. A party is not excused from
 making its disclosures because it has not fully investigated the case or because it challenges the sufficiency of another party’s disclosures. A party’s failure to make initial disclosures within the deadlines set forth in this section shall preclude the party from introducing witnesses or evidence not disclosed at the hearing, unless the party shows good cause for its failure to timely disclose.

(D) A party has an obligation to promptly supplement its initial disclosures as new information or evidence becomes known or available. Supplemental disclosures shall be made as soon as possible, and no later than 60 days before the date of commencement of the hearing. A party’s failure to make supplemental disclosures promptly upon discovery or availability of new information or evidence shall preclude the party from introducing witnesses or evidence not disclosed at the hearing, unless the party shows good cause for its failure to timely
 disclose.

(2) The disclosure of expert testimony shall comply with the following requirements:

(A) A party shall also disclose to the other parties the identities of any expert witnesses whose testimony it may use at the hearing.

(B) The disclosure specified in subparagraph (A) shall be accompanied by a summary of the witness’ expected testimony, including a description of the facts and data considered by the witness; a description of the witness’ qualifications, including a list of all publications authored in the previous 10 years; a list of all other cases in which, during the previous four years, the witness testified as an expert at a hearing or by deposition; and a statement of the compensation to be paid to the expert witness.

(C) Expert witness
 disclosures shall be made no later than 60 days before the date of commencement of the hearing. A party’s failure to make full and timely expert witness disclosures shall preclude the party’s use of the expert witness’ testimony or evidence at the hearing.

(3) Prehearing disclosures shall comply with the following requirements:

(A) In addition to the disclosures required in paragraphs (1) and (2), a party shall provide to the other parties the following information about the evidence that it may present at the hearing:

(i) The name, and, if not previously provided, the address and telephone number of each witness, separately identifying those the party expects to present and those it may call if the need arises.

(ii) An identification of each exhibit,
 separately identifying those items the party expects to offer and those it may offer if the need arises.

(B) Prehearing disclosures shall be made at least 30 days before the hearing.

(i) Within 14 days after prehearing disclosures are made, a party shall file and serve any objections, along with the grounds for each objection, to the admissibility of evidence.

(ii) These objections shall be decided on the first day of the hearing, or at a prehearing conference conducted pursuant to Section 11511.5 of the Government Code. Documents and individuals not timely disclosed without good cause shall be precluded from admission at the hearing.

(c) In addition to the disclosures required by subdivision (a), the parties may obtain discovery by oral deposition in
 California, in accordance with Sections 2025.010 to 2025.620, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure, except as described in this article. The school district may take the depositions of the employee and no more than four other witnesses, and the employee may take depositions of no more than five witnesses. Each witness deposition is limited to seven hours. An administrative law judge may allow the parties to conduct additional depositions only upon a showing of good cause. If a motion to conduct additional depositions is granted by the administrative law judge, the employee shall be given a meaningful opportunity to respond to new evidence introduced as a result of the additional depositions. An order granting a motion for additional depositions shall not constitute an extraordinary circumstance or good cause for purposes of extending the deadlines set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 44944.

(d) If the right to
 disclosures or oral depositions is denied by either the employee or the governing board, the exclusive right of a party seeking an order compelling production of discovery shall be pursuant to Section 11507.7 of the Government Code. If a party seeks protection from unreasonable or oppressive discovery demands, the exclusive right of a party seeking an order for protection shall be pursuant to Section 11450.30 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 90.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

44944.1.

(a) This section shall apply only to dismissal or suspension proceedings initiated pursuant to Section 44934.1.

(b) Once the governing board of the school district has initiated dismissal or suspension proceedings pursuant to Section 44934.1, the process described in this section shall be the exclusive means of pursuing a dismissal or suspension for the acts or events constituting the charge of egregious misconduct, and these specific acts or events shall not be used to support any additional or subsequent notice of suspension or dismissal pursuant to Section 44934. Once the governing board of the school district has initiated dismissal or suspension proceedings pursuant to Section 44934.1, the process
 described in this section shall be the exclusive means of pursuing a dismissal or suspension against the certificated employee until a written decision has been reached by the administrative law judge pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (e), the charges have been dismissed, or the dismissal or suspension proceeding has been settled or otherwise resolved. If a suspension initiated against an employee pursuant to Section 44934.1 is upheld, and a dismissal was not pursued on the same charges, the entry of judgment of the suspension under Section 44934.1 may be considered as evidence to support a subsequent notice of dismissal based on other charges. If a suspension initiated against an employee pursuant to Section 44934.1 is upheld, but the employee prevailed on the dismissal proceeding based on the same charges, the entry of judgment of the suspension under Section 44934.1 shall not be considered as evidence to support a subsequent notice of dismissal based on other charges.

(c) The hearing provided for in this section shall be initiated and conducted, and a decision made, in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, by an administrative law judge. The administrative law judge conducting the hearing shall have all the powers granted to an agency pursuant to that chapter.

(d) (1) (A) In a dismissal or suspension proceeding initiated pursuant to Section 44934.1, if a hearing is requested by the employee, the hearing shall be commenced within 60 days from the date of the employee’s demand for a hearing. The hearing date shall be established after consultation with the employee and the governing board, or their representatives, except that, if the parties are not able to reach agreement on a date, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall
 unilaterally set a date in compliance with this section. The Office of Administrative Hearings shall prioritize the scheduling of dismissal or suspension proceedings initiated pursuant to Section 44934.1 over other proceedings related to certificated school employees.

(B) The right of discovery of the parties shall not be limited to those matters set forth in Section 11507.6 of the Government Code but shall include the rights and duties of any party in a civil action brought in a superior court under Title 4 (commencing with Section 2016.010) of Part 4 of the Code of Civil Procedure. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, and except for the taking of oral depositions, no discovery shall occur later than 30 calendar days after the employee is served with a copy of the accusation pursuant to Section 11505 of the Government Code. In all cases, discovery shall be completed prior to seven calendar days before the date upon which the hearing
 commences. If any continuance is granted pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code, the time limitation for commencement of the hearing as provided in this subdivision shall be extended for a period of time equal to the continuance. The continuance or continuances granted pursuant to Section 11524 of the Government Code, if any, shall not extend by more than a total of 30 days the deadline set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d). The extension shall not include that period of time attributable to an unlawful refusal by either party to allow the discovery provided for in this section.

(2) If the right of discovery granted under paragraph (1) is denied by either the employee or the governing board, the exclusive right of a party seeking an order compelling production of discovery shall be pursuant to Section 11507.7 of the Government Code. If a party seeks protection from unreasonable or oppressive discovery demands, the exclusive
 right of a party seeking an order for protection shall be pursuant to Section 11450.30 of the Government Code.
